Wyoming, session 2026, HB0163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-37-107 by creating a new
subsection (d) is amended to read:

11-37-107. Creation of account; collection of
additional brand inspection fee; disposition of proceeds.

(d) Total costs assessed by the department of
administration and information or any other state entity,
HB0163

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0500
excluding the costs referenced in subsection (c) of this
section, shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the annual
portion of the fees collected by the council that are not
obligated under state or federal law.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0163